Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska47-116
Jails; sheriff or jailer; neglect of duty; penalty.

If the sheriff or jailer, having charge of any county jail, shall neglect or refuse to conform to all or any of the rules and regulations established by the Jail Standards Board, or to perform any other duty required of him or her by sections 47-101 to 47-116, he or she shall, upon conviction thereof for each case of such failure or neglect of duty, pay into the county treasury of the proper county for the use of such county a fine of not less than five dollars nor more than one hundred dollars, to be assessed by the district court of the proper district.

R.S.1866, c. 29, § 14, p. 246;

R.S.1913, § 3542;

C.S.1922, § 3009;

C.S.1929, § 47-114;

R.S.1943, § 47-116;

Laws 1996, LB 233, § 11;

Laws 2018, LB776, § 6.